Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.065

Partnership or joint venture deemed registered, when.

A partnership or joint venture shall be deemed registered under this chapter if any one of the general partners or venturers whose name appears in the name under which the partnership or venture does business is registered.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.